Washington statutes.
RCW 18.57.140

Advertising regulations.

On all cards, signs, letterheads, envelopes and billheads used by those licensed by this chapter to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery the word "osteopathic" shall always immediately precede the word "physician" and if the word "surgeon" is used in connection with said name, the word "osteopathic" shall also immediately precede said word "surgeon."

[ 1996 c 178 s 3; 1919 c 4 s 20; RRS s 10072.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1996 c 178: See note following RCW 18.35.110.